Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2502
Nebraska Plane Coordinate System, defined.

(1) For purposes of the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System Act, Nebraska Plane Coordinate System means the system of plane coordinates for designating the geographic position of points on, within, or above the surface of the earth, within the State of Nebraska, defined or located in reference to the National Spatial Reference System, or its successors, which have been established by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey, or its successors, for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth, within the State of Nebraska; and

(2) For purposes of more precisely defining the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System, it shall be the most recent system of plane coordinates adopted by the Geographic Information Systems Council, supported and published by the National Geodetic Survey, based on the National Spatial Reference System, and known as the State Plane Coordinate System, for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points within the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 64;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1602;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 498;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 11.